apertium-gla.gla.dix
    <pardef n="/bi__vbser">
      <e><p><l>bhith</l><r>bi<s n="vbser"/><s n="subst"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>tha</l><r>bi<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="indep"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>bheil</l><r>bi<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="dep"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>eil</l><r>bi<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="dep"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l><a/>bheil</l><r>bi<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="dep"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>bha</l><r>bi<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="indep"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>robh</l><r>bi<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="dep"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>bidh</l><r>bi<s n="vbser"/><s n="fti"/><s n="indep"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>bhitheas</l><r>bi<s n="vbser"/><s n="fti"/><s n="rel"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>bhios</l><r>bi<s n="vbser"/><s n="fti"/><s n="rel"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>bhi</l><r>bi<s n="vbser"/><s n="fti"/><s n="dep"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>bhitheadh</l><r>bi<s n="vbser"/><s n="cni"/><s n="indep"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>bhiodh</l><r>bi<s n="vbser"/><s n="cni"/><s n="indep"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>bitheadh</l><r>bi<s n="vbser"/><s n="cni"/><s n="dep"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>biodh</l><r>bi<s n="vbser"/><s n="cni"/><s n="dep"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/rach__vblex">
      <e><p><l>dol</l><r>rach<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="subst"/></r></p></e>

      <!-- No present tense forms? -->

      <e><p><l>chaidh</l><r>rach<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="past"/><s n="indep"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>deach</l><r>rach<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="past"/><s n="dep"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>deachaidh</l><r>rach<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="past"/><s n="dep"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>thèid</l><r>rach<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fti"/><s n="indep"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>thèid</l><r>rach<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fti"/><s n="rel"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tèid</l><r>rach<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fti"/><s n="dep"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>rachadh</l><r>rach<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="cni"/><s n="indep"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>reidheadh</l><r>rach<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="cni"/><s n="indep"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>dheigheadh</l><r>rach<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="cni"/><s n="indep"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rachadh</l><r>rach<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="cni"/><s n="dep"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>d'reidheadh</l><r>rach<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="cni"/><s n="dep"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>dheigheadh</l><r>rach<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="cni"/><s n="dep"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>thalla</l><r>rach<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/thig__vblex">
      <e><p><l>tighinn</l><r>thig<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="subst"/></r></p></e>

      <!-- No present tense forms? -->

      <e><p><l>thàinig</l><r>thig<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="past"/><s n="indep"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tàinig</l><r>thig<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="past"/><s n="dep"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>thig</l><r>thig<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fti"/><s n="indep"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>thig</l><r>thig<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fti"/><s n="rel"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tig</l><r>thig<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fti"/><s n="dep"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>thigeadh</l><r>thig<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="cni"/><s n="indep"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tigeadh</l><r>thig<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="cni"/><s n="dep"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>thig</l><r>thig<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/abair__vblex">
      <e><p><l>ràdh</l><r>abair<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="subst"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ràdha</l><r>abair<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="subst"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ràitinn</l><r>abair<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="subst"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>thuirt</l><r>abair<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/><s n="indep"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>thubhairt</l><r>abair<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/><s n="indep"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tuirt</l><r>abair<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/><s n="dep"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>tubhairt</l><r>abair<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/><s n="dep"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>abraidh</l><r>abair<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fti"/><s n="indep"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>their</l><r>abair<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fti"/><s n="indep"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>dh'abras</l><r>abair<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fti"/><s n="rel"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>their</l><r>abair<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fti"/><s n="rel"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>abair</l><r>abair<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fti"/><s n="dep"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>dh'abradh</l><r>abair<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="cni"/><s n="indep"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>theireadh</l><r>abair<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="cni"/><s n="indep"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>abradh</l><r>abair<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="cni"/><s n="dep"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>abair</l><r>abair<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/faigh__vblex">
      <e><p><l>faighinn</l><r>faigh<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="subst"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>fhuair</l><r>faigh<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/><s n="indep"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>d'fhuair</l><r>faigh<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/><s n="dep"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>gheibh</l><r>faigh<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fti"/><s n="indep"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>gheobh</l><r>faigh<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fti"/><s n="indep"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>gheibh</l><r>faigh<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fti"/><s n="rel"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>gheobh</l><r>faigh<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fti"/><s n="rel"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>faigh</l><r>faigh<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fti"/><s n="dep"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>gheibheadh</l><r>faigh<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="cni"/><s n="indep"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>gheobhadh</l><r>faigh<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="cni"/><s n="indep"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>faigheadh</l><r>faigh<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="cni"/><s n="dep"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>faigh</l><r>faigh<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>






  </pardefs>

    <e lm="bi"><i></i><par n="/bi__vbser"/></e>
    <e lm="rach"><i></i><par n="/rach__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="thig"><i></i><par n="/thig__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="abair"><i></i><par n="/abair__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="faigh"><i></i><par n="/faigh__vblex"/></e>
